Utah statutes.
31A-19a-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Classification system" or "classification" means the process of grouping
risks with similar risk characteristics so that differences in anticipated
costs may be recognized.
(2) (a)  "Developed losses" means losses adjusted using standard actuarial
techniques to eliminate the effect of differences between:
(i)  current payment or reserve estimates; and
(ii)  payments or reserve estimates that are anticipated to provide actual
ultimate loss payments.
(b)  For purposes of Subsection (2)(a), losses includes loss adjustment
expense.
(3)  "Dividend" means money paid to a policyholder from the remaining portion
of the premium paid for a policy:
(a)  based on the participating class of business; and
(b)  after the insurer has made deductions for:
(i)  losses;
(ii)  expenses;
(iii)  additions to reserves; and
(iv)  profit and contingencies.
(4)  "Expenses" means that portion of a rate attributable to:
(a)  acquisition;
(b)  field supervision;
(c)  collection expenses;
(d)  general expenses;
(e)  taxes;
(f)  licenses; and
(g)  fees.
(5)  "Experience rating" means a rating procedure that:
(a)  uses the past insurance experience of an individual policyholder to
forecast the future losses of the policyholder by measuring the policyholder's
loss experience against the loss experience of policyholders in the same
classification; and
(b)  produces a prospective premium credit, debit, or unity modification.
(6)  "Joint underwriting" means a voluntary arrangement established to provide
insurance coverage for a risk pursuant to which two or more insurers jointly
contract with the insured at a price and under policy terms agreed upon
between the insurers.
(7)  "Loss adjustment expense" means the expenses incurred by the insurer in
the course of settling claims.
(8) (a)  "Market" means the interaction between buyers and sellers consisting
of a:
(i)  product component; and
(ii)  geographic component.
(b)  A product component consists of identical or readily substitutable
products if the products are compared as to factors including:
(i)  coverage;
(ii)  policy terms;
(iii)  rate classifications; and
(iv)  underwriting.
(c)  A geographic component is a geographical area in which buyers seek access
to the insurance product through sales outlets and other distribution
mechanisms or patterns.
(9)  "Mass marketed plan" means a method of selling insurance when:
(a)  the insurance is offered to:
(i)  employees of a particular employer;
(ii)  members of a particular association or organization; or
(iii)  persons grouped in a manner other than described in Subsection
(8)(a)(i) or (ii), except groupings formed principally for the purpose of
obtaining insurance; and
(b)  the employer, association, or other organization, if any, has agreed to,
or otherwise affiliated itself with, the sale of insurance to its employees or
members.
(10)  "Prospective loss costs" means the same as pure premium rate.
(11)  "Pure premium rate" means that portion of a rate that:
(a)  does not include provisions for profit or expenses, other than loss
adjustment expenses; and
(b)  is based on historical aggregate losses and loss adjustment expenses that
are:
(i)  adjusted through development to their ultimate value; and
(ii)  projected through trending to a future point in time.
(12) (a)  "Rate" means that cost of insurance per exposure unit either
expressed as:
(i)  a single number; or
(ii)  as a pure premium rate, adjusted before any application of individual
risk variations, based on loss or expense considerations to account for the
treatment of:
(A)  expenses;
(B)  profit; and
(C)  individual insurer variation in loss experience.
(b)  "Rate" does not include a minimum premium.
(13)  "Rating tiers" means an underwriting and rating plan designed to
categorize insurance risks that have common characteristics related to
potential insurance loss into broad groups for the purpose of establishing a
set of rating levels that reflect definable levels of potential hazard or
risk.
(14)  "Riskiness" means the variability of results around the average expected
result.
(15)  "Supplementary rate information" includes one or more of the following
needed to determine the applicable rate in effect or to be in effect:
(a)  a manual or plan of rates;
(b)  a statistical plan;
(c)  a classification;
(d)  a rating schedule;
(e)  a minimum premium;
(f)  a policy fee;
(g)  a rating rule;
(h)  a rate-related underwriting rule;
(i)  a rate modification plan; or
(j)  any other similar information prescribed by rule of the commissioner as
supplementary rate information.
(16)  "Supporting information" includes one or more of the following:
(a)  data demonstrating actuarial justification for the basic rate factors,
classifications, expenses, and profit factors used by the filer;
(b)  the experience and judgment of the filer;
(c)  the experience or data of other insurers or rate service organizations
relied upon by the filer;
(d)  the interpretation of any other data relied upon by the filer;
(e)  descriptions of methods used in making the rates; or
(f)  any other information defined by rule as supporting information that is
required to be filed.
(17)  "Trending" means any procedure for projecting, for the period during
which the policies are to be effective:
(a)  losses to the average date of loss; or
(b)  premiums or exposures to the average date of writing.
